Maryland, session 2025, HB0726.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–105.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (I) “ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE” MEANS A HOUSE AND THE LOT
OR CURTILAGE ON WHICH THE HOUSE IS ERECTED.
(II) “ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE” INCLUDES:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0726*

HOUSE BILL 726
1. A CONDOMINIUM UNIT OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS A
LEGAL INTEREST IN THE CONDOMINIUM;
2. AN APARTMENT IN A COOPERATIVE APARTMENT
CORPORATION OF AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS A LEGAL INTEREST IN THE APARTMENT;
AND
3. A PART OF REAL PROPERTY USED OTHER THAN
PRIMARILY FOR RESIDENTIAL PURPOSES, IF THE REAL PROPERTY IS USED AS A
RESIDENCE BY AN INDIVIDUAL WHO HAS A LEGAL INTEREST IN THE REAL
PROPERTY.
[(2)] (3) “Active member” means:
(i) a shareholder in a family corporation;
(ii) a partner in a general partnership; or
(iii) a member of a limited liability company or partner in a limited
liability partnership who has or shares the authority to manage, control, and operate the
limited liability company or limited liability partnership and who shares the assets and
earnings of the limited liability company or limited liability partnership under an operating
agreement under § 4A–402 of the Corporations and Associations Article or under a
partnership agreement.
[(3)] (4) “Agricultural ownership entity” means a family corporation,
general partnership, limited liability company, or limited liability partnership that:
(i) owns real property that:
1. includes land receiving an agricultural use assessment
under § 8–209 of this article; and
2. includes land used as a homesite that is part of or
contiguous to a parcel described in item 1 of this item;
(ii) owns personal property used to operate the agricultural land;
and
(iii) owns no other property.
[(4)] (5) “Bicounty commission” means:
(i) the Maryland–National Capital Park and Planning Commission;

HOUSE BILL 726 3
(ii) the Washington Suburban Sanitary Commission; or
(iii) the Washington Suburban Transit Commission.
[(5)] (6) (i) “Dwelling” means:
1. a house that is:
A. used as the principal residence of the homeowner; and
B. actually occupied or expected to be actually occupied by
the homeowner for more than 6 months of a 12–month period beginning with the date of
finality for the taxable year for which the property tax credit under this section is sought;
and
2. the lot or curtilage on which the house is erected.
(ii) “Dwelling” includes:
1. a condominium unit that is occupied by an individual who
has a legal interest in the condominium;
2. an apartment in a cooperative apartment corporation that
is occupied by an individual who has a legal interest in the apartment; and
3. a part of real property used other than primarily for
residential purposes, if the real property is used as a principal residence by an individual
who has a legal interest in the real property.
[(6)] (7) “Family corporation” means a corporation that does not have any
stockholders other than the homeowner and the following members of the homeowner’s
family:
(i) a spouse or former spouse;
(ii) a child or stepchild;
(iii) a parent or stepparent;
(iv) a brother or sister;
(v) a son–in–law, daughter–in–law, stepson–in–law, or
stepdaughter–in–law;
(vi) a grandchild or stepgrandchild; or
(vii) a grandparent or stepgrandparent.

HOUSE BILL 726
[(7)] (8) “Homeowner” means an individual who has a legal interest in a
dwelling OR AN ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE or who is an active member of an agricultural
ownership entity that has a legal interest in a dwelling OR AN ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE.
[(8)] (9) “Legal interest” means an interest in a dwelling OR AN
ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE:
(i) as a sole owner;
(ii) as a joint tenant;
(iii) as a tenant in common;
(iv) as a tenant by the entireties;
(v) through membership in a cooperative;
(vi) under a land installment contract, as defined in § 10–101 of the
Real Property Article;
(vii) as a holder of a life estate; or
(viii) as a settlor, grantor, or beneficiary of a trust if:
1. the settlor, grantor, or beneficiary of the trust does not pay
rent or other remuneration to reside in the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE; and
2. legal title to the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE is
held in the name of the trust or in the names of the trustees for the trust.
[(9)] (10) “Taxable assessment” means the assessment on which the
property tax rate was imposed in the preceding taxable year, adjusted by the phased–in
assessment increase resulting from a revaluation under § 8–104(c)(1)(iii) of this article, less
the amount of any assessment on which a property tax credit under this section is
authorized.
(c) (1) If a dwelling OR AN ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE is not used primarily for
residential purposes, the Department shall apportion the total property assessment
between the part of the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE that is used for residential
purposes and the part of the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE that is not used for
residential purposes.
(2) If a homeowner does not actually reside in a dwelling for the required
time period because of illness or need of special care and is otherwise eligible for a property

HOUSE BILL 726 5
tax credit under this section, the homeowner may qualify for the property tax credit under
this section.
(3) If a homeowner otherwise eligible for a credit under this section does
not actually reside in a dwelling for the required time period because the dwelling is
damaged due to an accident or natural disaster, the homeowner may continue to qualify for
a credit under this section for the current taxable year and 2 succeeding taxable years even
if the dwelling has been removed from the assessment roll in accordance with § 10–304 of
this article.
(4) (i) For a homeowner who is an active member of an agricultural
ownership entity to qualify for the property tax credit under this section:
1. the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE must have
been owned and occupied by the active member:
A. at the time of its transfer to the agricultural ownership
entity; or
B. if the agricultural ownership entity is a limited liability
company and the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE was originally transferred to the
agricultural ownership entity as part of a conversion from a partnership under § 4A–211 of
the Corporations and Associations Article, then at the time of its transfer to the former
partnership; and
2. the agricultural ownership entity and the active member
who occupies the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE must file an application with the
Department establishing initial eligibility for the credit on or before June 30 for the
following taxable year and, at the request of the Department, must file an application in
any future year to verify continued eligibility.
(ii) Failure to file a timely application may result in disqualification
from the Homestead Tax Credit Program for the following taxable year.
[(iii) The credit may only be granted to one dwelling owned by the
agricultural ownership entity.
(iv) Participation in the credit program as the active member of an
agricultural ownership entity disqualifies any other dwellings owned by the active member
for the credit.]
(d) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraph [(6)] (5) of this subsection, the
Department shall authorize and the State, a county, or a municipal corporation shall grant
a property tax credit under this section for a taxable year unless during the previous
taxable year:

HOUSE BILL 726
(i) the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE was transferred for
consideration to new ownership;
(ii) the value of the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE was
increased due to a change in the zoning classification of the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL
RESIDENCE initiated or requested by the homeowner or anyone having an interest in the
property;
(iii) the use of the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE was
changed substantially; or
(iv) the assessment of the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE
was clearly erroneous due to an error in calculation or measurement of improvements on
the real property.
(2) [A homeowner must actually reside in the dwelling by July 1 of the
taxable year for which the property tax credit under this section is to be allowed.
(3)] A homeowner may claim a property tax credit under this section for
[only 1] A dwelling OR AN ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE.
[(4)] (3) If a property tax credit under this section is less than $1 in any
taxable year, the tax credit may not be granted.
[(5)] (4) (i) If the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE was
transferred for consideration in a deed dated on or after January 1 but before the beginning
of the next taxable year and the deed was recorded with the clerk of the circuit court or the
Department on or after July 1 but before September 1 of the next taxable year, the new
owner may submit a written application to the Department on or before September 1 of the
second taxable year following the date of the deed requesting that the date of the deed be
accepted by the Department as the date of transfer under paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(ii) 1. The applicant shall submit with the written application a
copy of the executed deed evidencing the date of the transfer.
2. If the applicant fails to submit a copy of the executed deed
as required under subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, the Department shall deny the
application.
(iii) The date of the transfer under this paragraph is the effective date
of the deed as described under § 3–201 of the Real Property Article.
(iv) If a homeowner submits an eligible application under this
paragraph after May 1 of the first taxable year following the date of the deed and the
homeowner is due to receive a reduction in the homeowner’s property tax bill in the second
taxable year following the date of the deed as a result of the credit under this section,

HOUSE BILL 726 7
property tax is not due on the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE for the second taxable
year following the date of the deed until 30 days after a revised tax bill is sent to the
homeowner.
[(6)] (5) (i) Except as provided under paragraph [(7)] (6) of this
subsection, to qualify for the credit under this section, a homeowner shall submit an
application for the credit to the Department as provided in this paragraph.
(ii) The application shall:
1. be made on the form that the Department provides;
2. provide the information required by the form;
3. include a statement by the homeowner under oath that the
facts stated in the application are true, correct, and complete; and
4. except as provided in subparagraph (iii) of this paragraph,
be filed on or before the May 1 preceding the first taxable year for which the property tax
credit under this section is to be allowed.
(iii) For a dwelling OR AN ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE that was last
transferred for consideration to new ownership on or before December 31, 2007, an
application shall be filed with the Department on or before December 30, 2013, or the
Department may not authorize and the State, county, and municipal corporation may not
grant the property tax credit under this section:
1. for the taxable year beginning July 1, 2014; and
2. for a taxable year beginning after June 30, 2015, unless an
application is filed as required under subparagraphs (i) and (ii) of this paragraph.
(iv) If a dwelling OR AN ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE previously
received a credit under this section and failed to qualify for 1 taxable year because of a
failure to file the application required under this paragraph, the Department:
1. shall grant the credit for the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL
RESIDENCE for the next following taxable year on the timely filing of the application by
the same homeowner who previously received the credit; and
2. shall calculate the prior year’s taxable assessment for the
dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE as if the credit had not been lost for the 1
intervening taxable year.
(v) The Department shall provide a homeowner the option to submit
the application required under this paragraph electronically on the Department’s website.

HOUSE BILL 726
[(7)] (6) If a homeowner submits an application to the Department under
this section and the Department determines that the homeowner was eligible for the credit
in the prior taxable year but failed to file an application for the credit as required under
this subsection:
(i) the homeowner shall be retroactively qualified for the
Homestead Property Tax Credit Program for the prior taxable year; and
(ii) the Department shall calculate the prior year’s taxable
assessment as if the credit had been granted for the prior taxable year.
[(8)] (7) (i) This paragraph shall be interpreted broadly to apply to
any homeowner who:
1. is at least 70 years of age;
2. was eligible for the credit in the prior taxable year but
failed to file an application for the credit; and
3. applies for a credit for the current taxable year.
(ii) For homeowners that meet the criteria under subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph, the Department shall calculate the current year’s taxable assessment as if
the credit had been granted for the prior taxable year.
(iii) A homeowner who meets the criteria under subparagraph (i) of
this paragraph is not due a reimbursement of property taxes paid in prior taxable years.
(f) (1) The Department shall give notice of the possible property tax credit
under this section.
(2) In addition to any other notice the Department provides under this
subsection, the Department shall:
(i) identify homeowners who may be eligible but have failed to apply
for the property tax credit under this section; and
(ii) include a separate insert with each assessment notice sent under
§ 8–401 of this article to each homeowner identified under item (i) of this paragraph that
informs the homeowner that the homeowner may be eligible for the property tax credit
under this section and how to apply for the credit.
(3) In addition to any other notice the Department provides under this
subsection, the Department shall mail a notice to each individual who acquires residential
real property and has not applied for the credit under this section within a reasonable
period of time after the individual[:

HOUSE BILL 726 9
(i)] acquires the property by recorded deed[; and
(ii) indicates that the property will be the individual’s principal
residence on the corresponding land instrument intake sheet described under § 3–104 of
the Real Property Article].
(4) The notice required under paragraph (3) of this subsection shall:
(i) inform the individual that the individual may be eligible for the
property tax credit under this section;
(ii) contain information on how to apply for the credit; and
(iii) inform the individual that the individual may apply to the
Department to have the date of the deed accepted as the date of transfer of the property for
purposes of the credit as provided in subsection [(d)(5)] (D)(4) of this section.
(5) (i) The Department shall design a document concerning the credit
under this section that shall be presented to the buyer of residential property at the
settlement for the property by the person conducting the settlement.
(ii) The document under this paragraph shall include:
1. the following statement in conspicuous type: [“If you plan
to live in this home as your principal residence, you] “YOU may qualify for the homestead
property tax credit. The homestead property tax credit may significantly reduce the amount
of property taxes you owe.”;
2. instructions on how to apply for the credit online; and
3. a complete application for the credit and instructions on
how to submit the paper application to the Department.
(iii) The Department shall make the document under this paragraph
available on its website where it may be easily accessed by persons conducting settlements
for residential property.
(6) The Department shall ensure that the information it provides under
this subsection is accurate and up–to–date.
(g) A homeowner who meets the requirements of this section shall be granted the
property tax credit under this section against the State, county, and municipal corporation
property tax and any property tax imposed for a bicounty commission imposed on the real
property of the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE.

HOUSE BILL 726
(i) (1) When property that has received a credit under this section for the
current taxable year includes improvements that are removed from the assessment roll
under § 10–304 of this article because of damage due to an accident or a natural disaster:
(i) the full benefit of the property tax abatement under § 10–304 of
this article may not be diminished by the amount of the credit;
(ii) the full benefit of that credit may not be diminished by the
property tax abatement under § 10–304 of this article and shall be reflected in the
assessment of the total property, including any new improvements, for the current taxable
year; and
(iii) the property shall be eligible to receive a credit under this section
for the current taxable year and the two succeeding taxable years regardless of the
existence or condition of the dwelling OR ADDITIONAL RESIDENCE.
(2) Neither the calculation of the abatement nor the assessment under this
subsection shall include an assessment less than zero.
(k) The tax credit under this section shall be known as the homestead property
tax credit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2025.